Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 403.200 is amended to read:
403.200. (1) There  is imposed on each consumer or paying retail subscriber who has telecom-
munications service or interconnected Voice over Internet Protocol  service, with access to the
emergency communications system a tax  equal to [ 75 cents] $1.00 per month or, for prepaid wireless
telecommunications service, [ 75 cents ] $1.00  per retail transaction. The tax must be  applied on a
telecommunications circuit designated for a particular consumer or subscriber. One  consumer or
subscriber line must  be counted for each circuit that is capable of generating usage on the line side
of the switched network regardless  of the quantity or ownership of customer premises equipment
connected to each circuit. For providers of central office based services, the tax  must be applied to
each line that has  unrestricted connection to the switched network. Those central office based ser-
vice lines that have restricted connection to the switched network must be charged based on  soft-
ware design in the central office that restricts  the number of station calls to and from the network.
For cellular, wireless or other common  carriers, the tax applies to a subscriber on a per instrument
basis and only if the subscriber’s place of primary use, as defined under 4 U.S.C. 124, is within  this
state.
(2) The consumer or subscriber is liable for the tax imposed by this section.
(3) The amounts of tax collected by the provider or seller are considered as payment by the
consumer or subscriber for that amount of tax.
(4) The tax imposed under this section, as it applies to prepaid wireless  telecommunications
service, shall be collected by the seller from  the consumer with respect to each retail transaction
occurring in this state. The amount of the tax shall be separately stated  on an invoice, receipt or
other similar document that the seller provides  to the consumer, or shall be otherwise disclosed to
the consumer.
(5) For purposes of this section, a retail transaction:
(a) Occurs in this state if it is made  in person by a consumer at a business location of the seller;
(b) If not made in  person by a consumer at a business location of the seller, occurs in this state
if the consumer’s shipping address, payment instrument billing  address, or other address provided
by the consumer for purposes of the transaction, is in this state; or
Enrolled House Bill 2449 (HB 2449-B) Page 1
(c) If insufficient information  exists to determine whether paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection
is accurate, occurs in  this state if the consumer’s prepaid wireless telephone number is associated
with an Oregon location.
(6) Any return made by the provider or seller collecting the tax must be accepted by  the De-
partment of Revenue as evidence of payments by the consumer or subscriber of amounts  of tax so
indicated upon the return.
SECTION 2.  ORS 403.200, as amended by section 1 of this 2019 Act, is amended to read:
403.200. (1) There is imposed on each consumer or paying retail subscriber who  has telecom-
munications service or interconnected Voice over  Internet Protocol service, with access to the
emergency communications system a tax  equal to [ $1.00] $1.25 per month or, for prepaid wireless
telecommunications  service,  [ $1.00] $1.25 per retail transaction. The tax must be applied on a tele-
communications circuit designated  for a particular consumer or subscriber. One consumer or sub-
scriber line must be counted for each circuit that is capable of generating usage on the line side
of the switched network regardless of the quantity or ownership  of customer premises equipment
connected to each circuit. For providers of central office based services, the tax  must be applied to
each line that has unrestricted connection to the switched network. Those central  office based ser-
vice  lines  that have restricted connection to the switched network must be charged based on soft-
ware design in the central office that restricts  the number of station calls to and from the network.
For cellular, wireless or other common  carriers, the tax applies to a subscriber on a per instrument
basis and only if the subscriber’s place of primary use, as defined under 4 U.S.C. 124, is within  this
state.
(2) The consumer or subscriber is liable for the tax imposed by this section.
(3) The amounts of tax collected by the provider or seller are considered as payment by the
consumer or subscriber for that amount of tax.
(4) The  tax imposed under this section, as it applies to prepaid wireless telecommunications
service, shall be collected by the seller from the  consumer with respect to each retail transaction
occurring in this state. The amount  of the tax shall be separately stated on an invoice, receipt or
other similar document that the seller provides to the consumer,  or shall be otherwise disclosed to
the consumer.
(5) For purposes of this section, a retail transaction:
(a) Occurs in this state if it is made  in person by a consumer at a business location of the seller;
(b) If not made in  person by a consumer at a business location of the seller, occurs in this state
if the consumer’s shipping address, payment  instrument billing address, or other address provided
by the consumer for purposes of the transaction, is in this state; or
(c) If insufficient information  exists to determine whether paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection
is accurate, occurs in this state if the consumer’s prepaid wireless telephone  number is associated
with an Oregon location.
(6) Any return made by the provider or seller collecting the tax must be accepted by  the De-
partment of Revenue as evidence of payments by the consumer or subscriber of amounts  of tax so
indicated upon the return.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 403.240 is amended to read:
403.240. (1) The Office of Emergency  Management shall distribute quarterly the entire amount
of the moneys in the Emergency Communications Account. The office shall  pay the following
amounts from the account:
(a) Administrative costs incurred during the preceding calendar quarter by the  Department of
Revenue in carrying out ORS 403.200 to 403.230 in  an amount that does not exceed six-tenths of
one percent of the amount in the account on  the date of distribution, or actual expenses incurred
by the department, whichever is less.
(b) Administrative costs to be incurred during the calendar quarter by the Office of  Emergency
Management in carrying out its duties under ORS 305.823  and 403.105 to 403.250. The amount to be
paid under this paragraph may not  exceed four percent of the amount in the account on the date
of distribution, and, on or before the next date of distribution, the office shall repay to the  account
Enrolled House Bill 2449 (HB 2449-B) Page 2
any amount received under this paragraph that exceeds the actual expenses incurred by the office
in the quarter.
(2) The office may:
(a) Provide funding for the Oregon Emergency Response System in  an amount that does not
exceed 15 percent of the legislatively approved budget for the Oregon  Emergency Response System
subject to availability of funds within the limit  for administrative costs in subsection (1)(b) of this
section.
(b) Prescribe the manner in which funding is provided to  the Oregon Emergency Response Sys-
tem under this subsection.
(3) The office shall use funds in the 9-1-1 Subaccount to pay for costs incurred during the pre-
ceding calendar quarter for emergency communications services provided by a 9-1-1 jurisdiction un-
der ORS  403.105 to 403.250. The office may not disburse funds in the 9-1-1 Subaccount to a 9-1-1
jurisdiction that does not have an approved 9-1-1 jurisdiction plan under ORS 403.130. The  office
shall make payments for costs of  the emergency communications system on behalf of a 9-1-1 juris-
diction, or make reimbursement to the 9-1-1 jurisdiction for such costs, only  after a reimbursement
or payment request has been submitted to the office in the  manner prescribed by the office. Re-
imbursement or payment requests for recurring and nonrecurring charges necessary  to enable the
9-1-1 jurisdiction to comply with  ORS 403.105 to 403.250 must be submitted directly to the office.
The costs reimbursable or payable under this subsection are only those costs incurred for:
(a) Modification of network routers or servers, central office switching and trunking equipment
or other transport equipment;
(b) Network development, hosting services, operation and maintenance;
(c) Database development, operation and maintenance;
(d) On-premises equipment procurement, maintenance and replacement;
(e) Conversion of pay station telephones required by ORS 403.140;
(f) Collection of the tax imposed by ORS 403.200 to 403.230;
(g) Addressing if the reimbursement or payment request is consistent with rules adopted  by the
office;  and
(h) An employee of a 9-1-1  jurisdiction obtaining certification as a telecommunicator or emer-
gency medical dispatcher from the Department of Public Safety  Standards and Training under ORS
181A.560.
(4) Subject to availability of funds, the office shall provide funding to  9-1-1 jurisdictions based
on cost information provided in their final plan under ORS 403.130. The office shall approve  9-1-1
jurisdiction plans that meet the requirements  set forth in ORS 403.115 (2) and (4). The office shall
limit funding for costs incurred prior  to the preceding calendar quarter to charges associated with
database development, network and on-premises equipment that  satisfies the requirements of ORS
403.115 (2) and (4). The office shall prescribe the manner in which funding  is provided under this
subsection.
(5) 9-1-1 jurisdictions may use funds distributed to the jurisdiction from an  account or subac-
count established in ORS 403.235 to repay loans from the Special Public Works Fund if the loans
were used for purposes that are allowable under ORS 403.105 to 403.250.
(6) The  office shall retain amounts remaining in the 9-1-1 Subaccount and may distribute the
amounts in a subsequent quarter for those purposes set forth in subsections  (3), (4) and (5) of this
section.
(7) The office shall review reimbursement or payment requests  for costs identified in subsection
(3) of this section, necessary to comply with  ORS 403.105 to 403.250, for the appropriateness of the
costs claimed. The office shall approve or reject the reimbursement or payment requests.
(8) After all amounts under subsections (1) and (2) of this section and ORS 403.235  (2) have been
paid, the office  shall allocate the balance of the Emergency Communications Account to cities on
a per capita basis and to counties on a per capita basis of each county’s  unincorporated area for
distribution directly to 9-1-1 jurisdictions as directed by the  city or county. However, each county
Enrolled House Bill 2449 (HB 2449-B) Page 3
must be credited a minimum of one percent of the balance of the account  after the amounts under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section and ORS 403.235 (2) have been paid.
(9) 9-1-1 jurisdictions shall submit an accounting report  to the office annually. The report must
be provided in the manner prescribed by the office and must include but not be limited to:
(a) Funds received and  expended under subsection (8) of this section for the purposes of fulfilling
the requirements of ORS 403.115;
(b) Local funds received and expended for the purposes of fulfilling the requirements of  ORS
403.115; and
(c) Local funds received and expended for the  purposes of providing emergency communications
services.
SECTION 4.  ORS 403.240, as amended by section 3 of this 2019 Act, is amended to read:
403.240. (1) The Office of Emergency  Management shall distribute quarterly the entire amount
of the moneys in the Emergency Communications Account. The office shall  pay the following
amounts from the account:
(a) Administrative costs incurred during the preceding calendar quarter by the  Department of
Revenue in carrying out ORS 403.200 to 403.230 in an amount that does not exceed six-tenths  of one
percent of the amount in the account on the date of distribution, or actual expenses incurred by  the
department, whichever is less.
(b) Administrative costs to be incurred during the calendar quarter by the Office of  Emergency
Management in carrying out its duties under ORS 305.823  and 403.105 to 403.250. The amount to be
paid under this paragraph may  not exceed [ four] 2.4  percent of the amount in the account on the
date of distribution, and, on or before the next date of distribution, the office shall repay to the
account any amount received under this paragraph that  exceeds the actual expenses incurred by the
office in the quarter.
(2) The office may:
(a) Provide funding for the Oregon  Emergency Response System in an amount that does not
exceed 15 percent of  the legislatively approved budget for the Oregon Emergency Response System
subject to availability of funds within the limit for  administrative costs in subsection (1)(b) of this
section.
(b) Prescribe the manner in which  funding is provided to the Oregon Emergency Response Sys-
tem under this subsection.
(3) The office shall use funds in the 9-1-1 Subaccount to pay for costs incurred during the pre-
ceding calendar quarter for emergency communications services provided by a 9-1-1 jurisdiction un-
der ORS 403.105 to 403.250. The office may not disburse funds in the 9-1-1 Subaccount to a  9-1-1
jurisdiction  that  does not have an approved 9-1-1 jurisdiction plan under ORS 403.130. The office
shall make payments for costs of the emergency communications system on  behalf of a 9-1-1 juris-
diction, or make reimbursement  to the 9-1-1 jurisdiction for such costs, only after a reimbursement
or payment request has been submitted to  the office in the manner prescribed by the office. Re-
imbursement or payment requests  for recurring and nonrecurring charges necessary to enable the
9-1-1 jurisdiction to comply with ORS 403.105 to 403.250 must be submitted  directly to the office.
The costs reimbursable or payable under this subsection are only those costs incurred for:
(a) Modification of network routers or servers, central office switching and trunking equipment
or other transport equipment;
(b) Network development, hosting services, operation and maintenance;
(c) Database development, operation and maintenance;
(d) On-premises equipment procurement, maintenance and replacement;
(e) Conversion of pay station telephones required by ORS 403.140;
(f) Collection of the tax imposed by ORS 403.200 to 403.230;
(g) Addressing if the reimbursement or payment request is consistent with rules adopted  by the
office;  and
Enrolled House Bill 2449 (HB 2449-B) Page 4
(h) An employee of a 9-1-1 jurisdiction obtaining certification  as a telecommunicator or emer-
gency medical dispatcher from the Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training under ORS
181A.560.
(4) Subject to availability of funds, the office shall provide funding to  9-1-1 jurisdictions based
on cost information provided in their final plan under ORS 403.130. The office shall approve  9-1-1
jurisdiction plans that meet the requirements  set forth in ORS 403.115 (2) and (4). The office shall
limit funding for costs incurred prior  to the preceding calendar quarter to charges associated with
database development, network and on-premises equipment that  satisfies the requirements of ORS
403.115 (2) and (4). The office shall prescribe the manner in which funding  is provided under this
subsection.
(5) 9-1-1 jurisdictions may use funds distributed to the jurisdiction from an  account or subac-
count established in ORS 403.235 to repay loans from the Special Public Works Fund if the loans
were used for purposes that are allowable under ORS 403.105 to 403.250.
(6) The  office shall retain amounts remaining in the 9-1-1 Subaccount and may distribute the
amounts in a subsequent quarter for those purposes set forth in subsections  (3), (4) and (5) of this
section.
(7) The office shall review reimbursement or payment requests  for costs identified in subsection
(3) of this section, necessary to comply with  ORS 403.105 to 403.250, for the appropriateness of the
costs claimed. The office shall approve or reject the reimbursement or payment requests.
(8) After all amounts under subsections (1) and (2) of this section and ORS 403.235  (2) have been
paid, the office  shall allocate the balance of the Emergency Communications Account to cities on
a per capita basis and to counties on a per capita basis of each county’s  unincorporated area for
distribution directly to 9-1-1 jurisdictions as directed by the  city or county. However, each county
must be credited a minimum of one percent of the balance of the account  after the amounts under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section and ORS 403.235 (2) have been paid.
(9) 9-1-1 jurisdictions shall submit an accounting report  to the office annually. The report must
be provided in the manner prescribed by the office and must include but not be limited to:
(a) Funds received and  expended under subsection (8) of this section for the purposes of fulfilling
the requirements of ORS 403.115;
(b) Local  funds received and expended for the purposes of fulfilling the requirements of ORS
403.115; and
(c) Local funds received and expended for the  purposes of providing emergency communications
services.
SECTION 5.
 Section 4, chapter  5, Oregon Laws 2002 (first special session), as amended by
section 1, chapter 4, Oregon Laws 2002 (third special session), section 1, chapter 629, Oregon Laws
2007, section 1, chapter 749, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 9, chapter 59, Oregon  Laws 2014, is
amended to read:
Sec. 4. (1) Taxes imposed under ORS 403.200 apply to subscriber bills issued on or after January
1, 2002, and before January 1, [ 2022] 2030, and to retail transactions made on or after October 1,
2015, and before January 1, [ 2022] 2030.
(2) The amendments to ORS 403.200  by section 1 of this 2019 Act apply to subscriber bills
issued and retail transactions made on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2021.
(3) The amendments to ORS 403.200  by section 2 of this 2019 Act apply to subscriber bills
issued and retail transactions made on or after January 1, 2021.
SECTION 6.
The amendments to ORS 403.240 by section  4 of this 2019 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2021.
SECTION 7.  ORS 403.235 is amended to read:
403.235. (1) The Emergency Communications Account  is established separate and distinct from
the General  Fund in the State Treasury. All moneys received by the Department of Revenue pur-
suant to ORS 403.200 to 403.230 and interest thereon must be paid to the State Treasurer to be  held
in a suspense account established under ORS 293.445.  After payment of refunds, the balance of the
moneys received must be paid into  the State Treasury and credited to the Emergency Communi-
Enrolled House Bill 2449 (HB 2449-B) Page 5
cations  Account. Interest earned by the account must be credited to the 9-1-1 Subaccount
established under subsection (2)  of this section. All moneys in the [ account] Emergency Com-
munications Account  are continuously  appropriated to the Office of Emergency Management and
must be used for the purposes described in ORS 403.240.
(2) The 9-1-1 Subaccount is established as a subaccount of the Emergency  Communications Ac-
count. Thirty-five percent of the amount in the Emergency Communications Account on the date  of
distribution must be  credited to the 9-1-1 Subaccount. Interest earned by the subaccount must
be credited to the subaccount. All moneys in the [ account] subaccount  are continuously appro-
priated to the Office  of Emergency Management and must be used for the purposes described in ORS
403.240 (3), (4) and (5).
Passed by House June 6, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2449 (HB 2449-B) Page 6